Louisiana, session 2026, SB417.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:1759(B)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1759. Appointment and terms of commissioners
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, the
board of commissioners of St. Mary Parish Consolidated Gravity Drainage
District No. 2A shall consist of seven members, subject to all other requirements
of qualifications for office provided in Subsection A of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.